Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 39A Statewide Emergency Management Programs

39A.010.
Legislative intent — Necessity.

The General Assembly realizes the Commonwealth is subject at all times to disaster or emergency occurrences which can range from crises affecting limited areas to widespread catastrophic events, and that response to these occurrences is a fundamental responsibility of elected government in the Commonwealth. It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish and to support a statewide comprehensive emergency management program for the Commonwealth, and through it an integrated emergency management system, in order to provide for adequate assessment and mitigation of, preparation for, response to, and recovery from, the threats to public safety and the harmful effects or destruction resulting from all major hazards, including but not limited to: flood, flash flood, tornado, blizzard, ice storm, snow storm, wind storm, hail storm, or other severe storms; drought, extremes of temperature, earthquake, landslides, or other natural hazards; fire, forest fire, or other conflagration; enemy attack, threats to public safety and health involving nuclear, chemical, or biological agents or weapons; sabotage, riot, civil disorder or acts of terrorism, and other domestic or national security emergencies; explosion, power failure or energy shortages, major utility system failure, dam failure, building collapse, other infrastructure failures; transportation-related emergencies on, over, or through the highways, railways, air, land, and waters in the Commonwealth; emergencies caused by spill or release of hazardous materials or substances; mass-casualty or mass-fatality emergencies; other technological, biological, etiological, radiological, environmental, industrial, or agricultural hazards; or other disaster or emergency occurrences; or catastrophe; or other causes; and the potential, threatened, or impending occurrence of any of these events; and in order to protect life and property of the people of the Commonwealth, and to protect public peace, health, safety, and welfare, and the environment; and in order to ensure the continuity and effectiveness of government in time of emergency, disaster, or catastrophe in the Commonwealth, it is hereby declared to be necessary:

To create a Division of Emergency Management as the emergency management agency of state government and to authorize the creation of local emergency management agencies in the cities, counties, and urban-county or charter county governments of the Commonwealth;

To confer upon the Governor, the county judges/executive of the counties, the mayors of the cities and urban-county governments of the Commonwealth, and the chief executive of other local governments the emergency powers provided in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

To establish provisions for mutual aid among the cities, counties, and urban-county or charter county governments of the Commonwealth, with other states, and with the federal government with respect to the performance of disaster and emergency preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation functions; and

To authorize the establishment of a statewide comprehensive emergency management program and integrated emergency management system, the promulgation of orders or administrative regulations, and the taking of other steps necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.015.
Definitions and chapter provisions applicable to KRS Chapters 39B to 39F.

The definitions and other provisions of this chapter shall apply to this chapter and to KRS Chapters 39B, 39C, 39D, 39E, and 39F unless the language or context of a particular statute requires otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 28, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.020.
Definitions for KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.

As used in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Adjutant General” means the executive head of the Department of Military Affairs vested with general direction and control authority for the department and the division of emergency management;

“Catastrophe” means a disaster or series of concurrent disasters which adversely affect the entire Commonwealth of Kentucky or a major geographical portion thereof;

“Chief executive officer” means a:

County judge/executive of a county;

Mayor of a consolidated local government;

Mayor of an urban-county government;

Chief executive officer of a charter county government;

Chief executive officer of a unified local government; or

Mayor of a city;

“Comprehensive emergency management program” means the public safety program developed, organized, implemented, administered, maintained, and coordinated by the Division of Emergency Management and local emergency management agencies created pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, to assess, mitigate, prepare for, respond to, or recover from, an emergency, declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe, or threat of any of those, as contemplated in KRS

39A.010

or as defined in this section;

“Coordination” means having and exercising primary state or local executive branch oversight for the purpose of organizing, planning, and implementing;

“County” means a county, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local government, or unified local government;

“Declared emergency” means any incident or situation declared to be an emergency, disaster, or catastrophe by executive order of the Governor, or a county judge/executive, or a mayor, or the chief executive of other local governments in the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

“Director” means the director of the Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Military Affairs;

“Disaster” means any incident or situation declared as such by executive action of the Governor, or the President of the United States, pursuant to federal law;

“Disaster and emergency response” means the performance of all emergency functions, other than war-related functions for which military forces are primarily responsible, including but not limited to: direction and control, incident command, or management; communications; fire protection services; police services; medical and health services; ambulance services; rescue; search and rescue or recovery; urban search and rescue; engineering; alerting and warning services; resource management; public works services; nuclear, chemical, biological, or other hazardous material or substance monitoring, containment, decontamination, neutralization, and disposal; emergency worker protection, site safety, site operations and response planning; evacuation of persons; emergency welfare services; emergency transportation; physical plant protection; temporary restoration of public utility services; emergency lighting and power services; emergency public information; incident investigation, hazards analysis, and damage assessment; and other functions related to effective reaction to a disaster or emergency or catastrophe, or the potential, threatened, or impending threat of any disaster or emergency or catastrophe, together with all other activities necessary or incidental to the preparation for and carrying out of the functions set out in this subsection;

“Division” means the Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Military Affairs;

“Emergency” means any incident or situation which poses a major threat to public safety so as to cause, or threaten to cause, loss of life, serious injury, significant damage to property, or major harm to public health or the environment;

“Executive action” means:

All orders and guidelines related to a COVID-19 declared emergency issued by the Governor or any state agency, the President of the United States or any federal agency, or a local governmental agency; and

Industry-specific guidelines related to a COVID-19 declared emergency adopted by a state agency that govern the industry; and

“Executive action”:

Does not mean informal or indefinite statements or recommendations made by government officials; and

Does not create a duty of care;

“Integrated emergency management system” means the unified and multidisciplinary disaster and emergency response infrastructure developed in the Commonwealth, under the coordination of the division, using methods which align state or local administrative, organizational, and operational resources, to accomplish the mission, goals, and objectives of the comprehensive emergency management program of the Commonwealth;

“Local disaster and emergency services organization” means that organization of public and private entities developed to carry out the multiagency disaster and emergency response of a city, county, urban-county or charter county pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

“Local emergency management agency” means the agency created, operated, and maintained to coordinate the local comprehensive emergency management program and disaster and emergency response of a city, county, and urban-county or charter county government pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

“Local emergency management director” or “Local director” means the executive head of the local emergency management agency, appointed pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

“State emergency management agency” means the Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Military Affairs; and

“State emergency management director” means the director of the Division of Emergency Management.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 99, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2021 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 2, 2021; 2021 ch. 205, § 2, effective April 11, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/11/21). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts. chs. 6 and 205, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Department of Military Affairs, KRS Ch. 36.

39A.030.
Rationale and purpose of program — Division of Emergency Management.

The General Assembly recognizes that the rationale and purpose of the comprehensive emergency management program of the Commonwealth has evolved from a program for response to threats to national security, enemy attack, and other national defense needs, to a program for response to all hazards, but primarily, domestic hazards and threats including natural, man-made, technological, industrial, or environmental emergencies or disasters, for which civil government is primarily responsible. Because of major changes in the rationale and necessity for emergency management capabilities, as well as the urgent requirement for multiagency participation and inter-agency coordination to ensure timely, effective, and appropriate disaster and emergency response in the Commonwealth, and to otherwise modernize and improve the administration, effectiveness, and relevance of the comprehensive emergency management program for the contemporary needs of the citizens of the Commonwealth, the General Assembly declares:

A Division of Emergency Management is hereby created as the emergency management agency of state government which shall develop the comprehensive emergency management program of the Commonwealth on behalf of the Governor, and in consultation with the cabinet secretaries of state government, other appropriate state agency heads, local elected chief executives, local emergency management directors, and local emergency planning committees, for the purpose of developing and enhancing comprehensive emergency management program policies, plans, or procedures to provide for a coordinated responsive, and integrated emergency management system in the Commonwealth;

The division may accept on behalf of the Commonwealth any grant, contribution, or fund, federal or otherwise, made to assist in meeting the costs of carrying out the provisions and purposes of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, and fully comply with all funding requirements imposed by the receipt and use of the grant, contribution, or fund; and

The term “Division of Emergency Management” shall constitute and designate the official name of the emergency management agency of state government created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and “Division of Emergency Management,” in the exact order or form as specified in this subsection, shall not be utilized by or assigned to any other agency of state or local government, or other state or local entity, or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth to constitute or designate the official name of any such agency, entity, or political subdivision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.040.
Administrative bodies attached to division.

The following administrative bodies shall be attached to the division for administrative purposes:

Governor’s Earthquake Hazards and Safety Technical Advisory Panel; and

Kentucky Emergency Response Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.050.
Responsibility of division for coordinating disaster and emergency services — Powers, authorities, and duties.

The Division of Emergency Management shall coordinate for the Governor all matters pertaining to the comprehensive emergency management program and disaster and emergency response of the Commonwealth. The division shall be the executive branch agency of state government having primary jurisdiction, responsibility, and authority for the planning and execution of disaster and emergency assessment, mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery for the Commonwealth; the coordination of all disaster and emergency response by and between all state agencies, all agencies of city, county, and urban-county or charter county government, all local entities, and all political subdivisions of the Commonwealth for an emergency, declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe as contemplated in KRS

39A.010

,

39A.020

, or

39A.030

; the coordination of, and liaison with, related or concerned federal government agencies, elected officials of other states, private organizations or private sector companies dealing with disaster and emergency response; the coordination of all recovery operations and mitigation initiatives subsequent to disasters or emergencies; and the coordination of all public information activities regarding state government disaster and emergency response operations.

The Division of Emergency Management shall have and exercise the following powers, authorities, and duties:

To develop, administer, and maintain a statewide comprehensive emergency management program for the Commonwealth, and through it an integrated emergency management system for the disaster and emergency response of the Commonwealth, which shall be coordinated with the emergency management programs, and other related public safety, emergency response, mitigation, or disaster recovery programs, of all appropriate federal government agencies including the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the federal Department of Homeland Security, the State Department, the Federal Aviation Administration, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the Department of Transportation, the Environmental Protection Agency, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, the Department of Defense, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the Department of Justice, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms, the National Transportation Safety Board, the Chemical Safety and Hazard Investigation Board, the Army Corps of Engineers, the National Security Council, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Federal Railroad Administration, the United States Geological Survey, the Department of Energy, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Housing and Urban Development, the American Red Cross, the other states, and other appropriate public or private agencies, to the fullest appropriate extent;

To coordinate the development, implementation, and maintenance of comprehensive emergency management programs by local emergency management agencies in the cities, counties, and urban-county or charter county governments of the Commonwealth to ensure that all such programs, agencies, and organizations are organized, administered, and operated as functional components of the integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth;

To develop and maintain a comprehensive, risk-based, all-hazards disaster and emergency response plan entitled “Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan,” the provisions of which shall establish the organizational structure to be utilized by state government for managing disaster and emergency response, and set forth the policies, procedures, and guidelines for the coordination and execution of all disaster and emergency response for an emergency, declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe in the Commonwealth. The Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan shall be submitted to the Governor for approval when the Governor assumes office following each gubernatorial election, or at other times as the director deems appropriate. The Governor shall provide written approval of the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan through issuance of an executive order, and the division shall file a copy of the executive order with the Legislative Research Commission. The Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan shall be the primary strategic disaster and emergency response planning component of the integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth, and shall be utilized and followed by all state agencies, all local government agencies, all local public agencies or entities, and all other political subdivisions of the Commonwealth which may be involved in disaster and emergency response in the Commonwealth. The Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan shall be updated by the division not less than annually;

To maintain and operate the State Emergency Operations Center facility, which shall be the official and primary state government twenty-four (24) hour warning point, communications, and command center, from which the Governor, cabinet secretaries, department heads, and other state agency officials can, at any time, rapidly, adequately, and effectively manage the disaster and emergency response of the Commonwealth. The State Emergency Operations Center facility shall be the primary state direction and control component of the integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth for the coordination of all disaster and emergency response in the Commonwealth;

To develop, monitor, and operate, on a twenty-four (24) hour per day basis, the appropriate alerting or warning systems, public safety telecommunications systems, or radio networks; any state trunked, fiber, or interactive communication systems; computer, fax, other telecommunications or information networks; and systems needed for communication and coordination with all necessary or appropriate federal, state, or local public safety, law enforcement, emergency management, or other disaster and emergency response agencies, and state or local dispatch centers in the Commonwealth, and other appropriate interests, and through these agencies and systems to receive or disseminate emergency information, or to receive timely notification of, and continual assessment of, all threatened or actual emergency incidents or disaster situations occurring anywhere in or near the Commonwealth;

To immediately notify the Governor, the adjutant general, and the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security, or his or her designee, in the event of any major emergency incidents or disaster occurrences, or the threatened or impending occurrence of any of these events, and to keep the Governor, the adjutant general, and the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security, or his or her designee, informed of all actions being taken in response to these events;

To respond to the scenes of emergencies or disasters, or their threatened or impending occurrence and to directly and immediately investigate, analyze, and assess the nature and seriousness of these situations; to convene meetings, gather information, conduct briefings, and evaluate ongoing emergency response activities; take actions to execute the appropriate provisions of the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan; coordinate the establishment and operation of a state incident management system; establish or manage sub-state or area emergency operations centers, or on-scene command posts; and fully expedite and coordinate the disaster and emergency response of the Commonwealth;

To establish and operate area field offices of the division, each office to be headed by an area manager, responsible for administering the policies, plans, programs, and duties of the division in specific geographic areas of the Commonwealth, including the coordination of comprehensive emergency management programs developed by the cities, counties, urban-county, or charter county governments in the areas;

To provide funds to the cities, counties, and urban-county or charter county governments of the Commonwealth to support the development, administration, operation, and maintenance of local emergency management agencies created pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

To require the regular submission of program administration data, records, materials, reports, or documents from local emergency management agencies as may be necessary and sufficient to conduct performance reviews and assessments to ensure compliance with all state or federal funding and program requirements, and to ensure local program compatibility and consistency with the mission, goals, and objectives of the comprehensive emergency management program and integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth;

To ascertain the requirements of the Commonwealth and its cities and counties for emergency resources and the necessities of life in the event of disaster or emergency; institute an emergency resource management plan and procure emergency supplies, materials, and equipment; and use or employ in time of emergency any of the property, services, and resources of state or local government in the Commonwealth for the purposes set forth in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

To institute public information and education programs, emergency management training programs, and exercise programs to test and evaluate emergency operations plans and disaster and emergency response and recovery capabilities; and

To promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 82, § 3, effective March 28, 2002; 2006, ch. 193, § 5, effective July 12, 2006.

39A.060.
Nature and scope of comprehensive program — Director under direction of adjutant general.

The General Assembly recognizes that the nature and scope of the activities necessary to develop and to administer a statewide comprehensive emergency management program, together with an integrated emergency management system requires the full support, cooperation, and active participation of all cabinets, departments, divisions, offices, or agencies of state government, local elected officials, local public agencies or entities, special districts, political subdivisions of the Commonwealth, volunteer organizations, individual citizens, and the private sector in this Commonwealth. To provide effective executive leadership for a program area of such broad scope and to ensure the professional administration of the comprehensive emergency management program and integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth, the General Assembly declares:

The Division of Emergency Management shall be headed by a director recommended by the Adjutant General and appointed by the Governor; and

The director shall have the powers, rights, responsibilities, and authorities, as provided in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, or other laws, and shall carry out all duties under the general direction of the Adjutant General of the Department of Military Affairs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Department of Military Affairs, KRS Ch. 36.

39A.070.
Powers, responsibilities, and duties of director.

The director, with the approval of the adjutant general, shall exercise the following powers, responsibilities, and duties:

To represent the Governor on all matters pertaining to the comprehensive emergency management program and the disaster and emergency response of the Commonwealth;

To coordinate the development of a statewide comprehensive emergency management program, and through it, an integrated emergency management system for the disaster and emergency response of the Commonwealth;

To promulgate administrative regulations and issue orders, directives, standards, rules, procedures, guidance, or recommended practices necessary to coordinate the development, administration, organization, operation, implementation, and maintenance of the statewide comprehensive emergency management program and the integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth;

To coordinate the development of comprehensive emergency management programs by the cities, counties, and urban-county or charter county governments as functional components of the integrated emergency management system of the Commonwealth;

To supervise the development and maintenance of the Kentucky Emergency Operations Plan, and to review and give concurrence to local emergency operations plans required pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

To coordinate the comprehensive emergency management program of the Commonwealth with the emergency management or other emergency response-related programs of the federal government, and of other states, to the fullest appropriate extent;

To advise the Governor and the adjutant general immediately of the occurrence or threatened or impending occurrence of any disaster or emergency, and to recommend to the Governor any emergency executive action that the Governor should execute;

To serve as the Governor’s primary liaison with local officials in the event of the occurrence, or threatened or impending occurrence, of any disaster or emergency in the cities, counties, urban-counties, or charter counties of the Commonwealth;

To take any other preparedness or response actions deemed necessary for adequate response to a disaster or emergency situation to include: requesting increased readiness activities by state or local agencies in advance of an actual disaster or emergency; requesting implementation of local emergency operations plans or the activation of local emergency operations centers; requesting reports from state or local agencies regarding emergency situations, damage assessments, or the taking of emergency response actions; and requesting the mobilization or deployment of any trained and equipped forces of state or local government for the disaster and emergency response purposes set forth in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;

To request and utilize the personnel, equipment, services, and facilities of existing officers and agencies of the Commonwealth and of all political subdivisions and special districts. All these officers and agencies shall fully cooperate with and extend their resources to the director as requested to the extent that local public safety is not unreasonably compromised;

To employ measures and give directions to the state or local boards of health as necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, or with the findings or recommendations of the boards of health, because of conditions arising from disasters, emergency situations, national security emergencies, or the threat thereof;

To request and utilize the services of state and local law enforcement officers for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, or any order of the Governor pertaining to disaster and emergency response;

On behalf of this Commonwealth, with the approval of the Governor or act of the General Assembly, to enter into reciprocal aid agreements or compacts with other states and the federal government, either on a statewide, local, county, or city basis, or with other states or a province of a foreign country. The mutual aid agreements shall be limited to the furnishing or exchange of food, clothing, medicine, and other supplies; engineering services; emergency housing; police services; National Guard personnel and resources while under the control of the state; health, medical, and related services; firefighting; rescue; search and rescue or recovery; urban search and rescue; hazardous materials response services, transportation and construction services and equipment; personnel necessary to provide or conduct these services and other supplies, equipment, facilities, personnel, and services as needed; the reimbursement of costs and expenses for equipment, supplies, personnel, and similar items for mobile support units, firefighting, search and rescue, and police units, and health units; and on the terms and conditions deemed necessary;

To sponsor and develop mutual aid plans and agreements among the urban-county or charter county governments, counties, cities, and other political subdivisions and special districts of the Commonwealth, similar to the mutual aid arrangements with other states referred to in subsection (13) of this section;

To procure motor vehicles, radio and telecommunications equipment, protective clothing, safety equipment, and other necessary supplies and materials to meet the emergency response, operational, and administrative needs of the division;

To identify deficiencies existing in the emergency management program organization, facilities, and capabilities of the Commonwealth, including but not limited to: personnel and administrative resources; state, sub-state, area, or local emergency operations centers; mobile command posts; emergency telecommunications and computer systems; alerting and warning systems; stockpiles of critical resources; or any other necessary elements, and to recommend to the adjutant general, for consideration by the Governor or the General Assembly or other appropriate funding authority, the administrative or operational funding requirements, and long-range capital construction or improvement projects needed to meet the emergency management infrastructure needs of the Commonwealth;

To serve as the state coordinating officer and notify the Governor of the appropriations necessary to fund the expected emergency operational or response costs of the division, and the Commonwealth’s share of the grants provided by Pub.L.No. 93-288, Title V, Federal Disaster Assistance Programs as amended by Pub.L.No. 100-707, the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, or successor acts or titles, and further, take action necessary to ensure entitlement to all other federal relief or assistance programs;

To cooperate with the President of the United States, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, and other appropriate federal offices and agencies, and the offices and agencies of other states in matters pertaining to the comprehensive emergency management program of the Commonwealth and nation; and in connection with these, to take any measures considered necessary to implement any request of the President and the appropriate federal offices and agencies, for any action requiring effective disaster and emergency response, including the direction or control and mobilization of disaster and emergency response forces; tests and exercises, warnings, and signals for drills or other emergency response activities and the mechanical devices to be used in connection with these; the shutting off of water mains, gas mains, electric power connections, and the suspension of all other utility services; the conduct of civilians and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic during, prior, and subsequent to a drill, emergency, declared emergency, or disaster; public meetings or gatherings; and the evacuation and sheltering of the civilian population; and

To delegate any authority vested in the director under KRS Chapters 39A to 39F and to provide for the subdelegation of any such authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 82, § 4, effective March 28, 2002; 2006, ch. 193, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2021 ch. 205, § 3, effective April 11, 2021.

39A.080.
Seals and markings of Division of Emergency Management to be affixed on vehicles used and operated by division.

In lieu of the official seal of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the division shall be authorized to design, display and affix the distinctive seal and markings of the Division of Emergency Management on any and all state vehicles owned, leased, or operated by the division for official purposes and operated by personnel of the division.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 15, effective July 15, 1998.

39A.090.
Executive actions — Time limit on directives issued by Governor — Extensions and modifications — Approval and termination by General Assembly — Waiver of immunity.

The Governor may make, amend, and rescind any executive actions as deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F.

Executive orders, administrative regulations, or other directives issued under this chapter by the Governor shall be in effect no longer than thirty (30) days unless an extension, modification, or termination is approved by the General Assembly prior to the extension of any executive order or directive that:

Places restrictions on the in-person meeting or places restrictions on the functioning of the following:

Elementary, secondary, or postsecondary educational institutions;

Private businesses or nonprofit organizations;

Political, religious, or social gatherings;

Places of worship; or

Local governments; or

Imposes mandatory quarantine or isolation requirements.

All other executive orders, administrative regulations, or directives that are not described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may exceed thirty (30) days if requested by a chief executive officer or a legislative body of a local government only for that local government and only for the period of time requested by the chief executive officer or a legislative body. The chief executive officer or a legislative body may make a written request for extensions or early termination of the executive order.

Upon the expiration of an executive order or other directive described in subsection (2)(a) of this section declaring an emergency or other implementation of powers under this chapter, the Governor shall not declare a new emergency or continue to implement any of the powers enumerated in this chapter based upon the same or substantially similar facts and circumstances as the original declaration or implementation without the prior approval of the General Assembly.

The General Assembly, by joint resolution, may terminate a declaration of emergency at any time.

The Commonwealth waives immunity for prospective equitable and declaratory relief only, under the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the United States for cases brought against it in federal jurisdictions pursuant to KRS

446.350

during emergencies declared under KRS Chapters 39A to 39F. No award of monetary damages, costs, or attorney fees is waived or authorized under this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 2, 2021; 2021 ch. 205, § 4, effective April 11, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/11/21). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts. chs. 6 and 205, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.